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DTC B0133/62 Short in P/T Squib RH Circuit (to B+)

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
The P/T squib RH circuit consists of the airbag sensor assembly and the seat belt pretensioner RH.
It causes the SRS to deploy when the SRS deployment conditions are satisfied.
For details of the function of each component, see OPERATION on page RS−3.
DTC B0133/62 is recorded when a B+ short is detected in the P/T squib RH circuit.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

B0133/62
S Short in P/T squib RH circuit (to B+)
S P/T squib RH malfunction
S Airbag sensor assembly malfunction

S Seat belt pretensioner RH (P/T squib RH)
SAirbagsensorassembly
SFloorNo.2wire
SDashwire (Benchseat)

WIRING DIAGRAM
See page DI−539.

INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Prepare for inspection (See step 1 on page DI−764).

2 Check seat type.

CHECK:
Confirm that the type of the front seat.
OK:

A: Separate seat
B: Bench seat

A Go to step 6.

A
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3 Check floor No. 2 wire (P/T squib RH circuit).

PREPARATION:
Connect thenegative ( −) terminal cable to thebattery,andwait
at least for 2 seconds.
CHECK:
(a)Turn the ignitionswitch toON.
(b) Measure the voltage between the body ground and PR+

of the floor No. 2 wire connector on the seat belt preten-
sioner RH (P/T squib RH) side.

OK:
Voltage:Below 1 V

NGRepairor replace floorNo.2wire.

OK
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4 Check airbag sensor assembly.

PREPARATION:
(a) Connect the connector to the airbag sensor assembly.
(b) Using a service wire, connect PR+ and PR− of the floor

No. 2 wire connector on the seat belt pretensioner RH
(P/T squib RH) side.

(c) Connect the negative (−) terminal cable to the battery,
and wait at least for 2 seconds.

CHECK:
(a) Turn the ignition switch to ON, and wait at least for 10 se-

conds.
(b) Clear the DTC stored in memory (See page DI−432).
(c)Turn the ignitionswitch toLOCK,andwaitat least for 10

seconds.
(d)Turn the ignitionswitch toON,andwaitat least for 10se-

conds.
(e) Check the DTC (See page DI−432).
OK:

DTCB0 133/62 isnotoutput.
HINT:
Codesother thancodeB0 133/62maybeoutputat this time,but
they are not relevant to this check.

NG Replace airbag sensor assembly.

OK
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5 Check P/T squib RH.

PREPARATION:
(a) Turn ignition switch to LOCK.
(b) Disconnect the negative (−) terminal cable from the bat-

tery, and wait at least for 90 seconds.
(c) Connect the seat belt pretensioner RH (P/T squib RH)

connector.
(d) Connect the negative (−) terminal cable to the battery,

and wait at least for 2 seconds.
CHECK:
(a) Turn the ignition switch to ON, and wait at least for 10 se-

conds.
(b) Clear the DTC stored in memory (See page DI−432).
(c)Turn the ignitionswitch toLOCK,andwaitat least for 10

seconds.
(d)Turn the ignitionswitch toON,andwaitat least for 10se-

conds.
(e) Check the DTC (See page DI−432).
OK:

DTCB0 133/62 isnotoutput.
HINT:
Codesother thancodeB0 133/62maybeoutputat this time,but
they are not relevant to this check.

NG Replace seat belt pretensioner RH
(P/T squib RH).

OK

From the results of the above inspection, the malfunctioning part can now be considered normal.
To make sure of this, use the simulation method to check. If the malfunctioning part can not be
detected by the simulation method, replace all SRS components including the wire harness.
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6 Check P/T squib RH circuit.

PREPARATION:
Connect the negative (−) terminal cable to the battery, and wait
at least for 2 seconds.
CHECK:
(a) Turn the ignition switch to ON.
(b) Measure the voltage between the body ground and PR+

of the seat belt pretensioner RH (P/T squib RH) side be-
tween the airbag sensor assembly and the seat belt pre-
tensioner RH (P/T squib RH).

OK:
Voltage: Below 1 V

NG Go to step 9.

OK
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7 Check airbag sensor assembly.

PREPARATION:
(a) Turn the ignition switch to LOCK.
(b) Disconnect the negative (−) terminal cable from the bat-

tery, and wait at least for 90 seconds.
(c) Connect the connector to the airbag sensor assembly.
(d) Using a service wire, connect PR+ and PR− of the con-

nector on the seat belt pretensioner RH (P/T squib RH)
side between the seat belt pretensioner RH (P/T squib
RH) and the airbag sensor assembly.

(e) Connect the negative (−) terminal cable to the battery,
and wait at least for 2 seconds.

CHECK:
(a) Turn the ignition switch to ON, and wait at least for 10 se-

conds.
(b) Clear the DTC stored in memory (See page DI−432).
(c) Turn the ignition switch to LOCK, and wait at least for 10

seconds.
(d) Turn the ignition switch to ON, and wait at least for 10 se-

conds.
(e) Check the DTC (See page DI−432).
OK:

DTC B0133/62 is not output.
HINT:
Codes other than code B0133/62 may be output at this time, but
they are not relevant to this check.

NG Replace airbag sensor assembly.

OK
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8 Check P/T squib RH.

PREPARATION:
(a) Turn the ignition switch to LOCK.
(b) Disconnect the negative (−) terminal cable from the bat-

tery, and wait at least for 90 seconds.
(c) Connect the seat belt pretensioner RH (P/T squib RH)

connector.
(d) Connect the negative (−) terminal cable to the battery,

and wait at least for 2 seconds.
CHECK:
(a) Turn the ignition switch to ON, and wait at least for 10 se-

conds.
(b) Clear the DTC stored in memory (See page DI−432).
(c) Turn the ignition switch to LOCK, and wait at least for 10

seconds.
(d) Turn the ignition switch to ON, and wait at least for 10 se-

conds.
(e) Check the DTC (See page DI−432).
OK:

DTC B0133/62 is not output.
HINT:
Codes other than code B0133/62 may be output at this time, but
they are not relevant to this check.

NG Replace seat belt pretensioner RH
(P/T squib RH).

OK

From the results of the above inspection, the malfunctioning part can now be considered normal.
To make sure of this, use the simulation method to check. If the malfunctioning part can not be
detected by the simulation method, replace all SRS components including the wire harness.
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9 Check floor No. 2 wire.

PREPARATION:
(a) Turn the ignition switch to LOCK.
(b) Disconnect the negative (−) terminal cable from the bat-

tery, and wait at least for 90 seconds.
(c) Disconnect the floor No. 2 wire from the dash wire.
(d) Connect the negative (−) terminal cable to the battery,

and wait at least for 2 seconds.
CHECK:
(a) Turn the ignition switch to ON.
(b) Measure the voltage between the body ground and PR+

of the floor No. 2 wire connector on the seat belt preten-
sioner RH (P/T squib RH) side.

OK:
Voltage: Below 1 V

NG Repair or replace floor No. 2 wire.

OK

Repair or replace dash wire.


